Nebraska, session 109, LB293.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 48-2706, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
48-2706 (1) No person shall knowingly enter into a co-employment
relationship in which less than a majority of the employees of the client in
this state are covered employees or in which less than one-half of the payroll
of the client in this state is attributable to covered employees.
(2) Except as specifically provided in the Professional Employer
Organization Registration Act or in the professional employer agreement, in
each co-employment relationship:
(a) The client shall be entitled to exercise all rights and shall be
obligated to perform all duties and responsibilities otherwise applicable to an
employer in an employment relationship;
(b) The professional employer organization shall be entitled to exercise
only those rights and obligated to perform only those duties and
responsibilities specifically required by the act or in the professional
employer agreement. The rights, duties, and obligations of the professional
employer organization as co-employer with respect to any covered employee shall
be limited to those arising pursuant to the professional employer agreement and
the act during the term of co-employment by the professional employer
organization of such covered employee; and
(c) Unless otherwise expressly agreed by the professional employer
organization and the client in a professional employer agreement, the client
retains the exclusive right to direct and control the covered employees as is
necessary to conduct the client's business, to discharge any of the client's
fiduciary responsibilities, or to comply with any licensure requirements
applicable to the client or to the covered employees.
(3) Except as specifically provided in the Professional Employer
Organization Registration Act, the co-employment relationship between the
client and the professional employer organization, and between each co-employer
and each covered employee, shall be governed by the professional employer
agreement. Each professional employer agreement shall include the following:
(a) The allocation of rights, duties, and obligations as described in this
section;
(b) A provision that the professional employer organization shall have
responsibility to pay wages to covered employees; to withhold, collect, report,
and remit payroll-related and unemployment taxes; and, to the extent the
professional employer organization has assumed responsibility in the
professional employer agreement, to make payments for employee benefits for
covered employees. For purposes of this section, wages does not include any
obligation between a client and a covered employee for payments beyond or in
addition to the covered employee's salary, draw, or regular rate of pay, such
as bonuses, commissions, severance pay, deferred compensation, profit sharing,
or vacation, sick, or other paid time off pay, unless the professional employer
organization has expressly agreed to assume liability for such payments in the
professional employer agreement;
(c) A provision that the professional employer organization shall have a
right to hire, discipline, and terminate a covered employee as may be necessary
to fulfill the professional employer organization's responsibilities under the
act and the professional employer agreement. The client shall have a right to
hire, discipline, and terminate a covered employee; and
(d) A provision that the responsibility to obtain workers' compensation
coverage for covered employees and for other employees of the client from an
insurer licensed to do business in this state and otherwise in compliance with
all applicable requirements shall be specified in the professional employer
agreement in accordance with section 48-2709. The client shall not be relieved
of its obligations under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act to provide
workers' compensation coverage in the event that the professional employer
organization fails to obtain workers' compensation insurance for which it has
assumed responsibility.
(4) With respect to each professional employer agreement entered into by a
professional employer organization, such professional employer organization
shall provide written notice to each covered employee affected by such
agreement. The professional employer organization shall provide, and the client
shall post in a conspicuous place at the client's worksite, the following:
(a) Notice of the general nature of the co-employment relationship between
and among the professional employer organization, the client, and any covered
-1-

LB293 LB293
2025 2025
employees; and
(b) Any notice required by the state relating to unemployment compensation
and the minimum wage.
(5) Except to the extent otherwise expressly provided by the applicable
professional employer agreement:
(a) A client shall be solely responsible for the quality, adequacy, or
safety of the goods or services produced or sold in the client's business;
(b) A client shall be solely responsible for (i) directing, supervising,
training, and controlling the work of the covered employees with respect to the
business activities of the client or when such employees are otherwise acting
under the express direction and control of the client and (ii) the acts,
errors, or omissions of the covered employees with regard to such activities or
when such employees are otherwise acting under the express direction and
control of the client;
(c) A client shall not be liable for the acts, errors, or omissions of a
professional employer organization or of any covered employee of the client and
a professional employer organization when such covered employee is acting under
the express direction and control of the professional employer organization;
(d) Nothing in this subsection shall limit any contractual liability or
obligation specifically provided in a professional employer agreement; and
(e) A covered employee is not, solely as the result of being a covered
employee of a professional employer organization, an employee of the
professional employer organization for purposes of general liability insurance,
fidelity bonds, surety bonds, employer's liability which is not covered by
workers' compensation, or liquor liability insurance carried by the
professional employer organization unless the covered employee is included for
such purposes by specific reference in the professional employer agreement and
in any applicable prearranged employment contract, insurance contract, or bond.
(6) When a professional employer organization obtains workers'
compensation coverage for its clients that is written by an authorized insurer,
it shall not be considered to be an insurer based on its provision of workers'
compensation insurance coverage to a client, even if the professional employer
organization charges the client a different amount than it is charged by the
authorized insurer.
(7) For purposes of this state or any county, municipality, or other
political subdivision thereof:
(a) Covered employees whose services are subject to sales tax shall be
deemed the employees of the client for purposes of collecting and levying sales
tax on the services performed by the covered employee. Nothing contained in the
Professional Employer Organization Registration Act shall relieve a client of
any sales tax liability with respect to its goods or services;
(b) Any tax or assessment imposed upon professional employer services or
any business license or other fee which is based upon gross receipts shall
allow a deduction from the gross income or receipts of the business derived
from performing professional employer services that is equal to that portion of
the fee charged to a client that represents the actual cost of wages and
salaries, benefits, workers' compensation, payroll taxes, withholding, or other
assessments paid to or on behalf of a covered employee by the professional
employer organization under a professional employer agreement;
(c) Any tax assessed or assessment or mandated expenditure on a per capita
or per employee basis shall be assessed against the client for covered
employees and against the professional employer organization for its employees
who are not covered employees co-employed with a client. Any benefit or
monetary consideration that meets the requirements of mandates imposed on a
client and that is received by covered employees through the professional
employer organization either through payroll or through benefit plans sponsored
by the professional employer organization shall be credited against the
client's obligation to fulfill such mandates; and
(d) In the case of a tax or an assessment imposed or calculated upon the
basis of total payroll, the professional employer organization shall be
eligible to apply any small business allowance or exemption available to the
client for the covered employees for the purpose of computing the tax.
(8)(a) Any health benefit plan offered by a professional employer
organization to its covered employees shall:
(i) Be fully insured by an authorized insurer; or
(ii) Be self-funded and:
(A) Utilize a third-party administrator licensed to conduct business in
this state;
(B) Hold all plan assets, including participant contributions, in a trust
account consistent with section 403 of the federal Employee Retirement Income
Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. 1103, as such section existed on January 1,
2025;
(C) Provide sound reserves for such health benefit plan as determined
using generally accepted actuarial standards of practice and consistent with
the prudence and loyalty standards of care for fiduciaries under the federal
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as such act existed on January
1, 2025;
(D) Provide written notice to each covered employee participating in such
health benefit plan that the health benefit plan is self-funded or is not fully
insured; and
(E) File a report that contains all of the information required by
subdivision (b) of this subsection with the department on a quarterly basis and
within ninety days after the last day of the fiscal year of such health benefit
-2-

LB293 LB293
2025 2025
plan.
(b) The report described in subdivision (a)(ii)(E) of this subsection
shall include all of the following information relating to the health benefit
plan from the most recent fiscal year:
(i) A financial statement;
(ii) A statement from a qualified actuary that the rates charged and any
reserves, both incurred and incurred but not reported, are sufficient to pay
claims and associated expenses;
(iii) Confirmation of a stop-loss insurance policy that provides coverage
in excess of the health benefit plan's retention of one hundred twenty-five
percent of the health benefit plan's expected health claims costs as determined
on an aggregate basis listing the professional employer organization as a named
insured. A policy issued to satisfy the requirements of this subdivision (8)(b)
(iii) shall be evidenced in a binder or policy by an insurer licensed to
transact the business of insurance in this state and contain a provision that
the coverage shall not be terminated by the insurer unless the professional
employer organization and the Commissioner of Labor receive a written notice of
termination from the insurer at least thirty days before the effective date of
the termination; and
(iv) A certificate of compliance that certifies that the health benefit
plan has been conducted in accordance with relevant laws of this state that
relate to professional employer organizations.
(c)(i) The department may hold a compliance hearing for any professional
employer organization if:
(A) The department provides written notice thirty days prior to such
hearing; and
(B) Such professional employer organization provides a self-funded health
benefit plan and fails to comply with subdivision (a)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) The hearing described in subdivision (c)(i) of this subsection shall
be conducted by the department and provide the professional employer
organization with the opportunity to be heard by the department.
(iii) Within thirty days after the hearing described in subdivision (c)
(ii) of this subsection of a professional employer organization, the department
may issue an order that requires such professional employer organization to
comply with the health benefit plan requirements in this subsection. Any
professional employer organization that is issued an order under this
subdivision (c)(iii) shall comply with such order within thirty days after
receiving such order.
(iv) The department shall revoke the registration under the Professional
Employer Organization Registration Act of any professional employer
organization that does not comply with an order issued under subdivision (c)
(iii) of this subsection. Such revocation shall occur within thirty days after
the final day for the professional employer organization to comply with such
order.
(8) A professional employer organization shall not offer its covered
employees any health benefit plan that is not:
(a) Fully insured by an authorized insurer; or
(b) Self-funded and in compliance with:
(i) Sections 44-7601 to 44-7618, except subdivisions (1) and (2) of
section 44-7606; and
(ii) The federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as such
act existed on January 1, 2024.
Sec. 2. Section 48-2708, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-2708 (1) A client and a professional employer organization shall each
be deemed an employer under the laws of this state for purposes of sponsoring
retirement and employee welfare benefit plans for its covered employees.
(2) An A fully insured employee welfare benefit plan that includes a
health benefit plan offered to the covered employees of a single professional
employer organization shall be for purposes of state law a single employee
welfare benefit plan and shall not be considered a multiple employer welfare
arrangement, as defined in section 44-7603, and shall be exempt from the
registration requirements of the Multiple Employer Welfare Arrangement Act.
(3) For purposes of the Small Employer Health Insurance Availability Act,
a professional employer organization shall be considered the employer of all of
its covered employees and all covered employees of any client participating in
a health benefit plan sponsored by a single professional employer organization
shall be considered employees of the professional employer organization.
Subject to any eligibility requirements imposed by the plan or policy, the
insurer shall accept and insure all employees of the client and all
beneficiaries of those employees.
Sec. 3. Original section 48-2708, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and section 48-2706, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-3-